Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202566-203
Rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property.

(1) The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall offer a rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property.

(2)(a) The rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property as defined in subdivisions (4)(a) and (b) of section 66-202 is the lesser of fifty percent of the cost of the qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property or four thousand five hundred dollars for each motor vehicle.

(b) A qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property is not eligible for a rebate under this section if the person or entity applying for the rebate has claimed another rebate or grant for the same motor vehicle under any other state rebate or grant program.

(3) The rebate for qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property as defined in subdivision (4)(c) of section 66-202 is the lesser of fifty percent of the cost of the qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property or two thousand five hundred dollars for each qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property.

(4) No qualified clean-burning motor vehicle fuel property shall qualify for more than one rebate under this section.

Laws 2015, LB581, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB902, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 69;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 354.